Missouri, session 2026, HB2140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.599, to read as follows:
67.599. 1. The governing body of a county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than one thousand but fewer than one thousand five hundred inhabitants may adopt an
order or ordinance imposing a sales tax on all retail sales made within the county that
are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The rate of such tax may be imposed in
increments of one-eighth of one percent but shall not exceed one percent.
2. Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the county, on any date available for elections for the county, a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose such tax. Such tax
shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed by law. Such tax shall be stated separately
from all other charges and taxes. The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the county
solely for the purpose of providing funding for county facilities including, but not
limited to, the operation and maintenance of county facilities.
3. (1) The ballot of submission for such tax shall contain, but need not be limited
to, the following language: "Shall ______ (insert the county name) impose a sales tax at
a rate of _______ (insert percentage) percent for the purpose of providing funding for
county facilities?".
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2140 2
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, such tax shall become effective on the first day of
the second calendar quarter immediately following notification to the state department
of revenue. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the question, such tax shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the county and
such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the county voting on
the question.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
5. (1) All moneys collected under this section by the director of the department
of revenue on behalf of such county, less one percent for cost of collection, which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety
bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created and shall be known as the "County Facilities Sales Tax Fund". Moneys
in the fund shall not be deemed to be state moneys and shall not be commingled with
any moneys of the state. The director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund
and credited to the county for erroneous payments and overpayments made and may
redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such county.
(2) Any moneys in the special fund that are not needed for current expenditures
shall be invested in the same manner as other moneys are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the
district which levied the tax. Moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the designated
purposes.
6. The governing body of a county that has adopted such tax may submit the
question of repeal of the tax to the voters on any date available for elections for the
county. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-
first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal,
such tax shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting
on the question.
7. If such tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all moneys remaining in
the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. The

HB 2140 3
county shall notify the director of the state department of revenue of the repeal or
termination at least ninety days before the effective date of the repeal or termination.
The director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two
percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayments of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
credit of such account. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of the repeal
or termination, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the county and
close the account of that county. The director shall notify such county of each instance
of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
✔